dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="पा__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उँ</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उं</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओस्</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इयोस्</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उन्</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊन्</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जगाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिनु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खुल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पठ/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बटार/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन्छस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="फाल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेनौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सुन/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ून्</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="थाल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="झर्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भूल्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>याइसकिस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सिक्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छोड__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="घुमा__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इँदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ग/ट्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>र</l>
          <r>ट्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बुझ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िलिने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="खुल्"><i>खुल</i><par n="खुल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लिं"><i>लिं</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चलाउँ"><i>चलाउँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="घुमा"><i>घुमा</i><par n="घुमा__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="झर्"><i>झर्</i><par n="झर्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भूल्"><i>भूल्</i><par n="भूल्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छोड"><i>छोड</i><par n="छोड__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बुझ"><i>बुझ</i><par n="बुझ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मिलाउँ"><i>मिलाउँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छँ"><i>छँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चढाउँ"><i>चढाउँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="अपन्"><i>अपन</i><par n="पठ/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खाँ"><i>खाँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिं"><i>दिं</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नपाउँ"><i>नपाउँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वनाउँ"><i>वनाउँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नियाल्"><i>नियाल्</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जगाइ"><i>जगाइ</i><par n="जगाइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुन्"><i>सुन</i><par n="सुन/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="रहँ"><i>रहँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पा"><i>पा</i><par n="पा__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="थाल्"><i>थाल</i><par n="थाल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बटार्"><i>बटार</i><par n="बटार/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्झँ"><i>सम्झँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सिक्"><i>सिक्</i><par n="सिक्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लाउँ"><i>लाउँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गाउँ"><i>गाउँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पठ्"><i>पठ</i><par n="पठ/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फाल्"><i>फाल</i><par n="फाल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गट्"><i>ग</i><par n="ग/ट्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गराउँ"><i>गराउँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
